test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nyenecyh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ненэцьʼ: # Noun 'man' - full paradigm /Type 31/
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom: ненэцьʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc: ненэцямʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen: ненэцяʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat: ненэцяндʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [ненэцяӈгана, ненэцяӈгна]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl: ненэцяӈгад
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros: ненэцямна
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom: ненэцяӈгʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc: ненэцяӈгʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen: ненэцяӈгʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom: ненэцяˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc: ненэцие
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen: ненэциеˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat: ненэцяӈгˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [ненэцяӈгаˮна, ненэцяӈгˮна]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl: ненэцяӈгат
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros: ненэциеˮмна

     ненэцьʼ+N+Tra: ненэцяӈэ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Car: ненэцянзиˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Equ: ненэцяндремʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Equ+Lat: ненэцьяндревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ненэцям, ненэцями]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ненэцял
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ненэцянда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ненэцямиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ненэцялиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ненэцямаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ненэцялаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ненэцяндоʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ненэцям, ненэцями]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ненэцянд  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ненэцянда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ненэцямиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ненэцямаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ненэцяндаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ненэцяндоʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ненэцян, ненэцяни] 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ненэцянд  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ненэцянда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ненэцяниʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ненэцяндиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ненэцянаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ненэцяндаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ненэцяндоʼ  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈган, ненэцяӈгани] 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ненэцяӈганд  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ненэцяӈганда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ненэцяӈганиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ненэцяӈгандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ненэцяӈгандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ненэцяӈганаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ненэцяӈгандаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ненэцяӈгандоʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈганан, ненэцяӈгнан, ненэцяӈганани]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ненэцяӈгананд  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ненэцяӈгананда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ненэцяӈгананиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ненэцяӈганандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ненэцяӈганандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ненэцяӈгананаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ненэцяӈганандаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ненэцяӈганандоʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгадан, ненэцяӈгдан, ненэцяӈгадани]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ненэцяӈгаданд  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ненэцяӈгаданда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: ненэцяӈгаданиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ненэцяӈгадандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ненэцяӈгадандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ненэцяӈгаданаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ненэцяӈгадандаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ненэцяӈгадандоʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ненэцямнан, ненэцямнани]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ненэцямнанд  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ненэцямнанда 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ненэцямнаниʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ненэцямнандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ненэцямнандиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ненэцямнанаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ненэцямнандаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ненэцямнандоʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгаюн, ненэцяӈгюн]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ненэцяӈгаюд, ненэцяӈгюд]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [ненэцяӈгаюда, ненэцяӈгюда]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ненэцяӈгаюниʼ, ненэцяӈгюниʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ненэцяӈгаюдиʼ, ненэцяӈгюдиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ненэцяӈгаюдиʼ, ненэцяӈгюдиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [ненэцяӈгаюнаˮ, ненэцяӈгюнаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ненэцяӈгаюдаˮ, ненэцяӈгюдаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [ненэцяӈгаюдоʼ, ненэцяӈгюдоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгаюн, ненэцяӈгюн]  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [ненэцяӈгаюд, ненэцяӈгюд]  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [ненэцяӈгаюда, ненэцяӈгюда] 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [ненэцяӈгаюниʼ, ненэцяӈгюниʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [ненэцяӈгаюдиʼ, ненэцяӈгюдиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [ненэцяӈгаюдиʼ, ненэцяӈгюдиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [ненэцяӈгаюнаˮ, ненэцяӈгюнаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [ненэцяӈгаюдаˮ, ненэцяӈгюдаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [ненэцяӈгаюдоʼ, ненэцяӈгюдоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгаюн, ненэцяӈгюн]  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [ненэцяӈгают, ненэцяӈгют]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [ненэцяӈгаюта, ненэцяӈгюта]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [ненэцяӈгаюниʼ, ненэцяӈгюниʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [ненэцяӈгаютиʼ, ненэцяӈгютиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [ненэцяӈгаютиʼ, ненэцяӈгютиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [ненэцяӈгаюнаˮ, ненэцяӈгюнаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [ненэцяӈгаютаˮ, ненэцяӈгютаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [ненэцяӈгаютоʼ, ненэцяӈгютоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ненэциен, ненэциени] 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ненэциед   
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ненэциеда  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ненэциениʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ненэциедиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ненэциедиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ненэциенаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ненэциедаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ненэциедоʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ненэциен, ненэциени]   
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ненэциед   
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ненэциеда  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ненэциениʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ненэциедиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ненэциедиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ненэциенаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ненэциедаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ненэциедоʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ненэциеˮн  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ненэциет   
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ненэциета  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ненэциеˮниʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ненэциетиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ненэциетиʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ненэциеˮнаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ненэциетаˮ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ненэциетоʼ 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгаˮн, ненэцяӈг]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [ненэцяӈгат, ненэцяӈг]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [ненэцяӈгата, ненэцяӈг]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [ненэцяӈгаˮниʼ, ненэцяӈг]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [ненэцяӈгатиʼ, ненэцяӈгтиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [ненэцяӈгатиʼ, ненэцяӈгтиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [ненэцяӈгаˮнаˮ, ненэцяӈгˮнаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [ненэцяӈгатаˮ, ненэцяӈгтаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [ненэцяӈгатоʼ, ненэцяӈгтоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгаˮнан, ненэцяӈгˮнан]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ненэцяӈгаˮнат, ненэцяӈгˮнат]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ненэцяӈгаˮната, ненэцяӈгˮната]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ненэцяӈгаˮнаниʼ, ненэцяӈгˮнаниʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ненэцяӈгаˮнатиʼ, ненэцяӈгˮнатиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ненэцяӈгаˮнатиʼ, ненэцяӈгˮнатиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [ненэцяӈгаˮнанаˮ, ненэцяӈгˮнанаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ненэцяӈгаˮнатаˮ, ненэцяӈгˮнатаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ненэцяӈгаˮнатоʼ, ненэцяӈгˮнатоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ненэцяӈгатан, ненэцяӈгтан]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ненэцяӈгатат, ненэцяӈгтат]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ненэцяӈгатата, ненэцяӈгтата]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ненэцяӈгатаниʼ, ненэцяӈгтаниʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ненэцяӈгататиʼ, ненэцяӈгтатиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ненэцяӈгататиʼ, ненэцяӈгтатиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ненэцяӈгатанаˮ, ненэцяӈгтанаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ненэцяӈгататаˮ, ненэцяӈгтатаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ненэцяӈгататоʼ, ненэцяӈгтатоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ненэциеˮманан       
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ненэциеˮманат  
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ненэциеˮманата 
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ненэциеˮмананиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ненэциеˮманатиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ненэциеˮманатиʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ненэциеˮмананаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ненэциеˮманатаˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ненэциеˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative 

     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Abs: ненэцянд
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ненэцяндав, ненэцяндув]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ненэцяндар
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [ненэцяндада, ненэцяндда]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [ненэцяндамиʼ, ненэцяндмиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ненэцяндриʼ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [ненэцяндадиʼ, ненэцянддиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ненэцяндваˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ненэцяндраˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [ненэцяндадоʼ, ненэцянддоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ненэцяндав, ненэцяндув]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ненэцяндамд
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [ненэцяндамда, ненэцяндмда]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [ненэцяндамиʼ, ненэцяндмиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [ненэцяндамдиʼ, ненэцяндмдиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [ненэцяндамдиʼ, ненэцяндмдиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ненэцяндваˮ
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [ненэцяндамдаˮ, ненэцяндмдаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [ненэцяндамдоʼ, ненэцяндмдоʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ненэцяндан
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ненэцянданд
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [ненэцянданда, ненэцянднда]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [ненэцянданиʼ, ненэцяндниʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [ненэцяндандиʼ, ненэцяндндиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [ненэцяндандиʼ, ненэцяндндиʼ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [ненэцянданаˮ, ненэцянднаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [ненэцяндандаˮ, ненэцяндндаˮ]
     ненэцьʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [ненэцяндандоʼ, ненэцяндндоʼ]
                   
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)
